zh-TW: 明膠或膠凝劑來源: 洋菜; 牛明膠; 鹿角菜膠; 膠原蛋白胜肽; 魚明膠; 無明膠; 植物性; 豬明膠; 其他
hu: Zselatin vagy zselésítőanyag származása: Agar-agar; Marhazselatin; Karragén; Kollagén peptidek; Halzselatin; Zselatinmentes; Növényi alapú; Sertészselatin; Egyéb
tr: Jelatin veya jelleştirici maddenin kaynağı: Agar; Sığır jelatini; Karajenan; Kolajen peptitleri; Balık jelatini; Jelatin içermez; Bitki bazlı; Domuz jelatini; Diğer
ko: 젤라틴 또는 겔화제 공급원: 한천; 소고기 젤라틴; 카라기난; 콜라겐 펩타이드; 피시 젤라틴; 무젤라틴; 식물성; 돼지고기 젤라틴; 기타
cs: Zdroj želatiny nebo želírující látky: Agar; Hovězí želatina; Karagenan; Kolagenové peptidy; Rybí želatina; Bez želatiny; Rostlinného původu; Vepřová želatina; Ostatní
ru: Источник желирующего агента: Агар; Говяжий желатин; Каррагинан; Пептиды коллагена; Рыбный желатин; Без желатина; Растительного происхождения; Свиной желатин; Другое
ro-RO: Gelatină sau sursă de agent gelifiant: Agar; Gelatină de vită; Caragenan; Peptide de colagen; Gelatină de pește; Fără gelatină; Pe bază de plante; Gelatină de porc; Altele
bg-BG: Източник на желатин или желиращ агент: Агар-агар; Говежди желатин; Карагенан; Колагенови пептиди; Рибен желатин; Без желатин; На растителна основа; Свински желатин; Друго
ja: ゼラチンまたはゲル化剤の供給源: 寒天; ビーフゼラチン; カラギナン; コラーゲンペプチド; フィッシュゼラチン; ゼラチンフリー; 植物由来; ポークゼラチン; その他
el: Πηγή προέλευσης ζελατίνης ή πηκτικού μέσου: Άγαρ; Ζελατίνη βοδινού; Καραγενάνη; Πεπτίδια κολλαγόνου; Ζελατίνη ψαριού; Χωρίς ζελατίνη; Φυτικής προέλευσης; Ζελατίνη χοιρινού; Άλλο
zh-CN: 明胶或胶凝剂来源: 琼脂; 牛明胶; 卡拉胶; 胶原蛋白肽; 鱼明胶; 不含明胶; 植物基; 猪明胶; 其他
da: Gelatine-/geleringsmiddels oprindelse: Agar; Oksegelatine; Carrageenan; Kollagenpeptider; Fiskegelatine; Gelatinefri; Plantebaseret; Svinegelatine; Andet
vi: Nguồn gốc gelatin hoặc chất tạo đông: Agar; Gelatin bò; Carrageenan; Peptide collagen; Gelatin cá; Không chứa gelatin; Gốc thực vật; Gelatin heo; Khác
en: Gelatin or gelling agent source: Agar; Beef gelatin; Carrageenan; Collagen peptides; Fish gelatin; Gelatin-free; Plant-based; Pork gelatin; Other
es: Fuente de gelatina o agente gelificante: Agar; Gelatina de res; Carragenina; Péptidos de colágeno; Gelatina de pescado; Sin gelatina; A base de plantas; Gelatina de cerdo; Otra
fr: Origine de la gélatine ou de l’agent gélifiant: Agar-agar; Gélatine de bœuf; Carraghénane; Peptides de collagène; Gélatine de poisson; Sans gélatine; À base de plantes; Gélatine de porc; Autre
sl-SI: Vir želatine ali želirnega sredstva: Agar; Goveja želatina; Karagenan; Kolagenski peptidi; Ribja želatina; Brez želatine; Rastlinskega izvora; Svinjska želatina; Drugo
sv: Källa för gelatin eller geleringsmedel: Agar; Nötgelatin; Karragenan; Kollagenpeptider; Fiskgelatin; Gelatinfri; Växtbaserad; Fläskgelatin; Övrigt
fi: Gelatiinin tai hyytelöimisaineen lähde: Agar; Naudan liivate; Karrageeni; Kollageenipeptidit; Kalaliivate; Liivatteeton; Kasvipohjainen; Sian liivate; Muu
lt-LT: Želatinos arba stingdiklio šaltinis: Agaras; Jautienos želatina; Karageninas; Kolageno peptidai; Žuvies želatina; Be želatinos; Augalinės kilmės; Kiaulienos želatina; Kita
pt-BR: Fonte da gelatina ou do agente gelificante: Ágar-ágar; Gelatina bovina; Carragenina; Peptídeos de colágeno; Gelatina de peixe; Sem gelatina; De origem vegetal; Gelatina suína; Outro
pl: Źródło żelatyny lub środka żelującego: Agar; Żelatyna wołowa; Karagen; Peptydy kolagenowe; Żelatyna rybia; Bez żelatyny; Roślinne; Żelatyna wieprzowa; Inne
th: แหล่งที่มาของเจลาตินหรือสารก่อเจล: วุ้น; เจลาตินเนื้อ; คาราจีแนน; คอลลาเจนเปปไทด์; เจลาตินปลา; ไม่มีเจลาติน; จากพืช; เจลาตินหมู; อื่นๆ
de: Herkunft der Gelatine bzw. des Geliermittels: Agar; Rindergelatine; Carrageen; Kollagenpeptide; Fischgelatine; Gelatinefrei; Pflanzenbasiert; Schweinegelatine; Sonstige
it: Fonte di gelatina o agente gelificante: Agar; Gelatina di manzo; Carragenina; Peptidi di collagene; Gelatina di pesce; Senza gelatina; A base vegetale; Gelatina di maiale; Altro
sk-SK: Želatína alebo zdroj želírujúcej látky: Agar; Hovädzia želatína; Karagénan; Kolagénové peptidy; Rybia želatína; Bez želatíny; Rastlinného pôvodu; Bravčová želatína; Iný
nb: Gelatin- eller geleringsmiddelkilde: Agar; Storfegelatin; Karragenan; Kollagenpeptider; Fiskegelatin; Gelatinfri; Plantebasert; Svinegelatin; Annet
pt-PT: Fonte de gelatina ou agente gelificante: Ágar; Gelatina bovina; Carragenina; Péptidos de colagénio; Gelatina de peixe; Sem gelatina; De origem vegetal; Gelatina suína; Outra
nl: Gelatine- of geleermiddelbron: Agar; Rundergelatine; Carrageen; Collageenpeptiden; Visgelatine; Gelatinevrij; Plantaardig; Varkensgelatine; Overig
hr-HR: Izvor želatine ili sredstva za želiranje: Agar; Goveđa želatina; Karagenan; Kolagenski peptidi; Riblja želatina; Bez želatine; Biljnog podrijetla; Svinjska želatina; Ostalo